Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.580

Proceedings.

(1) The department may refer a violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under it to a state, county, or city attorney, who may initiate proceedings as appropriate and prosecute the matter as prescribed by law.

(2) This chapter does not require the department to refer minor violations of this chapter for legal proceedings if public interest is adequately served in the circumstances by written notice or warning.

[ 2018 c 236 s 509.]